Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-119.01
Voting system, defined.

Voting system means the process of creating, casting, and counting ballots and includes any software or service used in such process.

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 7.